Louisiana, session 2026, HB450.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2491(E) and 2551(5) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§2491. Establishment and maintenance of employment lists
Except for the positions of entrance firefighter, entrance police officer,
entrance jailer, secretary to the chief, departmental records clerk, and for the entrance
classes for which the operation and maintenance of radio, alarm, or signal systems
for the respective fire or police service is the primary duty, the board shall establish
and maintain employment lists containing names of persons eligible for appointment
to the various classes of positions in the classified service, as follows:
* * *
E. Any person whose name is placed upon the competitive employment list
for the entrance or lowest ranking class in the classified service who has served in
the armed forces of the United States of America during the times of war or for one
hundred eighty days or more, and has been honorably discharged or discharged
under honorable conditions, shall have added to his final test score a total of five
points at the time of placing his name upon the list. Proof of such service and
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 450 ENROLLED
discharge shall be required by the board or the state examiner in any manner it deems
advisable.
* * *
§2551. Establishment and maintenance of employment lists
Except for the positions of entrance firefighter, entrance police officer,
entrance jailer, secretary to the chief, departmental records clerk, and for the entrance
classes for which the operation and maintenance of radio, alarm, or signal systems
for the respective fire or police service is the primary duty, the board shall establish
and maintain lists containing names of persons eligible for appointment to the
various classes of positions in the classified service as follows:
* * *
(5) Any person whose name is placed upon the competitive employment list
for the entrance or lowest ranking class in the classified service who has served in
the armed forces of the United States of America during time of war or for one
hundred eighty days or more, and who has been honorably discharged or discharged
under honorable conditions, shall have added to his final test score a total of five
points at the time of placing his name upon the list. Proof of such service and
discharge shall be required by the board or state examiner in any manner it deems
advisable.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.